Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-835
Authority; administrative costs; apportionment.

The authority may charge to and equitably apportion among participating eligible institutions its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2932;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 32;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1732;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 35;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 18.